test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_alge_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - luŋkke: # ok HADDE
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Nom:  luŋkke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Gen:  luŋke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Acc:  luŋke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Ill:  luuŋkán
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Loc:  luŋkkeest
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Com:  luŋkkijn
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Abe:  luŋkettáá
    luŋkke+N+Ess:  luŋkken
    luŋkke+N+Par:  luŋkked
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Nom:  luŋkeh
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Gen:  [luuŋkij, luŋkij]
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Acc:  luuŋkijd
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Ill:  luŋkkijd
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Loc:  luuŋkijn
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Com:  [luŋkijguin, luŋkijgijn]
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Abe:  luŋkijttáá

  Noun - puicce: # ok HADDE
    puicce+N+Sg+Nom:  puicce
    puicce+N+Sg+Gen:  puice
    puicce+N+Sg+Acc:  puice
    puicce+N+Sg+Ill:  puuicán
    puicce+N+Sg+Loc:  puicceest
    puicce+N+Sg+Com:  puiccijn
    puicce+N+Sg+Abe:  puicettáá
    puicce+N+Ess:  puiccen
    puicce+N+Par:  puicced
    puicce+N+Pl+Nom:  puiceh
    puicce+N+Pl+Gen:  [puuicij, puicij]
    puicce+N+Pl+Acc:  puuicijd
    puicce+N+Pl+Ill:  puiccijd
    puicce+N+Pl+Loc:  puuicijn
    puicce+N+Pl+Com:  [puicijguin, puicijgijn]
    puicce+N+Pl+Abe:  puicijttáá

  Noun - tigge: # ok HADDE
    tigge+N+Sg+Nom: tigge
    tigge+N+Sg+Gen: tige
    tigge+N+Sg+Acc: tige
    tigge+N+Sg+Ill: tiigán
    tigge+N+Sg+Loc: tiggeest
    tigge+N+Sg+Com: tiggijn
    tigge+N+Sg+Abe: tigettáá
    tigge+N+Ess: tiggen
    tigge+N+Par: tigged
    tigge+N+Pl+Nom: tigeh
    tigge+N+Pl+Gen: [tiigij, tigij]
    tigge+N+Pl+Acc: tiigijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Ill: tiggijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Loc: tiigijn
    tigge+N+Pl+Com: [tigijguin, tigijgijn]
    tigge+N+Pl+Abe: tigijttáá

  Noun - utke: # ok 
    utke+N+Sg+Nom: utke
    utke+N+Sg+Gen: uđhe
    utke+N+Sg+Acc: uđhe
    utke+N+Sg+Ill: uutkán
    utke+N+Sg+Loc: uđheest
    utke+N+Sg+Com: uđhijn
    utke+N+Sg+Abe: uđhettáá
    utke+N+Ess: utken
    utke+N+Par: utked
    utke+N+Pl+Nom: uđheh
    utke+N+Pl+Gen: [uuđhij, uđhij]
    utke+N+Pl+Acc: uuđhijd
    utke+N+Pl+Ill: uđhijd
    utke+N+Pl+Loc: uuđhijn
    utke+N+Pl+Com: [uđhijguin, uđhijgijn]
    utke+N+Pl+Abe: uđhijttáá

  Noun - pulkke: # ok HADDE
    pulkke+N+Sg+Nom: pulkke
    pulkke+N+Sg+Gen: pulhe
    pulkke+N+Sg+Acc: pulhe
    pulkke+N+Sg+Ill: puulkán
    pulkke+N+Sg+Loc: pulheest
    pulkke+N+Sg+Com: pulhijn
    pulkke+N+Sg+Abe: pulhettáá
    pulkke+N+Ess: pulkken
    pulkke+N+Par: pulkked
    pulkke+N+Pl+Nom: pulheh
    pulkke+N+Pl+Gen: [puulhij, pulhij]
    pulkke+N+Pl+Acc: puulhijd
    pulkke+N+Pl+Ill: pulhijd
    pulkke+N+Pl+Loc: puulhijn
    pulkke+N+Pl+Com: [pulhijguin, pulhijgijn]
    pulkke+N+Pl+Abe: pulhijttáá
